Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 1 Primacy and Reclamation Act of Tennessee [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]
59-8-114. Inspection of surface coal mining and reclamation operations — Sign — Violations — Records and reports — Monitoring data collection and analysis. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

The commissioner shall make inspections of any surface coal mining and reclamation operation that are necessary to determine whether the operation is in compliance with this part, and all rules promulgated and permits issued, pursuant to this part, and has a right of entry to, upon, or through any surface coal mining and reclamation operation in order to conduct the inspections.

The commissioner's inspections shall:

Occur on an irregular basis, averaging not less than one (1) partial inspection per month and one (1) complete inspection per calendar quarter for the surface coal mining and reclamation operation covered by each permit;

Occur without prior notice to the permittee or the permittee's agents or employees, except as necessary for on-site meetings with the permittee or operator; and

Include the filing of inspection reports adequate to enforce the requirements of, and to carry out the terms and purposes of, this part.

Each permittee shall conspicuously maintain at the entrances to each surface coal mining and reclamation operation, a clearly visible sign that states the name, business address, and telephone number of the permittee and the permit number of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation.

If an inspector detects a violation of this part, the inspector shall immediately inform the operator, permittee, or person in writing and make a written report of the violation to the commissioner. The written communication and report shall not be considered a complaint issued pursuant to § 59-8-116; however, a complaint may arise from violations contained in the communication and report.

Each inspector shall notify the operator or the person in charge of the mining or reclamation operation of the inspector's presence on the permitted area, unless the operator or person in charge of the operation is not reasonably available on the site during the inspection. The operator or the person in charge of the operation, or the operator's or person's designee, has the right to accompany the inspector during the inspection of the permitted area.

The board shall require, by rules promulgated under § 59-8-103(b)(1), that all permittees:

Establish and maintain appropriate records;

Make monthly reports to the commissioner;

Install, use, and maintain any necessary monitoring equipment or methods;

Evaluate results in accordance with the methods, locations, intervals, and manner that the board prescribes; and

Provide other information relative to surface coal mining and reclamation operations that the board deems reasonable and necessary.

For surface coal mining and reclamation operations that remove or disturb strata serving as aquifers, which significantly insure hydrologic balance or water use, either on or off the mining site, the commissioner shall specify:

Monitoring sites to record the quantity and quality of surface drainage above and below the mine site as well as in the potential zone of influence;

Monitoring sites to record level, amount, and samples of ground water and aquifers potentially affected by the mining and also directly below the deepest coal seam to be mined;

Records of well logs and borehole data to be maintained; and

Monitoring sites to record precipitation.

The monitoring data collection and analysis required by this section shall be conducted according to standards and procedures set forth by the board to ensure the reliability and validity of the data collection and analysis or findings derived from the data collection and analysis.

The authorized representatives of the commissioner, without advance notice, and upon presentation of appropriate credentials:

Have the right of entry to, upon, or through any surface coal mining and reclamation operation or any premises in which any records required to be maintained under subsection (f) or (g) are located; and

May, at reasonable times, but without delay, have access to and copy any records and inspect any monitoring equipment or method of operation required under this part.

The commissioner shall make copies of any records, reports, inspection materials, or information obtained under this part immediately available to the public at convenient locations in the area of the mining.

Whenever, on the basis of any information available to the commissioner, including receipt of information from any person, the commissioner has reason to believe that any operator, permittee, or person is in violation of this part or a rule promulgated by the board, or any permit condition, or complaint or cease and desist order issued under this part, the commissioner shall investigate, and, if the violation is confirmed, take appropriate action within ten (10) days; however, the commissioner shall take appropriate action immediately if proof is provided that an imminent danger of significant environmental harm exists.

The identity of any person supplying information shall remain confidential, if requested by the person.

When an inspection results from information provided to the commissioner by any person, the commissioner shall notify the person when the inspection is proposed to be carried out and the person shall be allowed to accompany the inspector during the inspection.

Within ten (10) days of the inspection, or fifteen (15) days of the receipt of a complaint if there is no inspection, the commissioner shall send a complete report to the person who reported the information.

Any person dissatisfied with the action of the commissioner may appeal as provided in § 59-8-120.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-115. Request for
release of all or part of performance bond or deposit.
[Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

A permittee may file with the commissioner a request for the release of all or part of a performance bond or deposit. A request for release of all or part of a performance bond or deposit shall indicate the location of the area and number of acres affected by the operation, the location of the area and number of acres of grading and revegetation accomplished by the permittee, and other information as the board may require by rules. If the request and the commissioner's inspection of the area affected show that the permittee is entitled to release of all or any portion of the bond or deposit, the commissioner shall approve the request and release all or a portion of the permittee's bond or deposit, as appropriate under this part.

If the commissioner does not approve the request, the bond or deposit shall not be released until the permittee corrects the deficiencies found by the commissioner.

A bond may be released on a portion of a permitted area if the permittee files a request containing the required information, the commissioner approves the request, and an inspection of the area affected shows compliance with the reclamation requirements of this part.

Within thirty (30) days after an application for bond or deposit release has been initiated and filed with the commissioner, the permittee shall submit a copy of an advertisement placed at least once a week for four (4) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation. The advertisement is considered part of any bond release application and shall contain a notification of the precise location of the land affected, the number of acres, the permit number and the date that the permit was approved, the amount of the bond filed and the portion of the bond sought to be released, the type and appropriate dates of reclamation work performed, and a description of the results achieved as the results relate to the operator's approved plan.

In addition, as part of any bond release application, the permittee shall submit copies of letters that the operator has sent to adjoining landowners, local government bodies, planning agencies, and sewage and water treatment authorities or water companies, if applicable, in the locality in which the surface coal mining and reclamation operations took place, notifying them of the operator's intention to seek partial or total release from the bond.

Upon receipt of any notification and request under this section, the commissioner shall, within thirty (30) days, inspect and evaluate the reclamation work involved. The evaluation shall consider, but not be limited to, the degree of difficulty to complete or evaluate any remaining reclamation, whether pollution or diminution of surface or subsurface water is occurring, the probability of continuation of the pollution or diminution, and the estimated cost of abating or correcting it. The commissioner shall notify the permittee in writing of the commissioner's decision to release or not to release all or part of the performance bond or deposit within sixty (60) days from the filing of the request, if no public hearing is held, and if a public hearing is held, within thirty (30) days after the hearing date. The commissioner shall send a copy of any notification of a decision not to release all or part of a bond to the permittee's surety. The commissioner's decision may be appealed pursuant to subsection (i).

The commissioner may release all or part of the bond or deposit when the commissioner is satisfied that the reclamation covered by the bond or deposit, or portion of the bond or deposit, has been accomplished as required by this part. The remaining bond shall be sufficient to satisfy all final reclamation requirements.

When a permittee performs the backfilling, regrading, topsoiling, drainage control, site preparation, spoil treatments, mulching, and initial planting of the vegetative cover in accordance with the approved plan as noted on an annual report, the commissioner may issue to the permittee and the permittee's surety a partial release of sixty percent (60%) of the surety bond for each acre of the affected area with respect to which the approved reclamation plan has been carried out. The remaining bond shall be held for at least five (5) years after the last year of augmented seeding, fertilizing, irrigation, or other work to assure that all reclamation requirements have been successfully met. A portion of the remaining bond may be released prior to the elapsing of five (5) years in accordance with board rules.

The commissioner shall retain an amount of the bond for the affected area, which would be sufficient for a third party to cover the cost of all remaining reclamation work and reestablishing vegetation. The remainder of the bond or deposit shall not be released under subdivision (d)(2) so long as the disturbed lands are contributing suspended solids to streamflow or runoff outside the permit area in excess of the requirements set by this part or until soil productivity for prime farmlands has returned to equivalent levels of yield as nonmined prime farmlands of the same soil type in the surrounding area under equivalent management practices as determined from the soil survey performed pursuant to this part. When a silt dam or impoundment approved as part of the mining or reclamation plan is to be retained as a permanent impoundment pursuant to § 59-8-110, the portion of the bond may be released under subdivision (d)(1) so long as the silt dam or impoundment meets the post-mining land use criteria and water quality and quantity concerns, and provisions for sound future maintenance by the permittee or the landowner have been made with the commissioner.

The permittee shall not be denied access to the mining site for the purposes of completing or maintaining reclamation work because of the expiration of the permittee's lease, until the permittee's entire performance bond has been released.

If the commissioner disapproves the application for release of all or part of the bond, the commissioner shall notify the permittee and the permittee's surety, stating the reasons for disapproval and recommending specific corrective actions necessary to secure the release, and allowing the permittee an opportunity for a hearing. The notice and recommendation shall be handed to the permittee in person, or sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the permanent address shown on the application for a permit. The notice shall specify how the permittee has failed to comply with this part or rules promulgated pursuant to this part.

When any application for total or partial bond release is filed with the commissioner, the commissioner shall notify the chief executive officer of the county in which the surface coal mining and reclamation operation is located by certified mail at least thirty (30) days prior to the release of all or a portion of the bond.

Any person with a valid legal interest, which might be adversely affected by release of all or a portion of the bond, or the responsible officer or head of any federal, state, or local governmental agency that has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect to any environmental, social, or economic impact involved in the operation, or development and enforcement of environmental standards with respect to such operations, has the right to file written objections to the proposed release from bond to the commissioner within thirty (30) days after the last publication of the newspaper notice provided for in subsection (b). If one (1) or more written objections to a release of bond is filed, and a hearing requested, the commissioner shall inform all the interested parties of the time and place of the hearing, and hold a public hearing in the locality of the surface coal mining operation proposed for bond release, or in Nashville, at the option of the objector, within thirty (30) days of the request for a hearing. The commissioner shall advertise the date, time, and location of the public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality for two (2) consecutive weeks.

Without prejudice to the rights of the objectors or the applicant, or the responsibilities of the commissioner, the commissioner may convene an informal conference as provided for in this part to resolve written objections.

A petition for appeal may be filed by:

The applicant for release; or

By any aggrieved person who:

Provided written objections during the time period specified in subsection (g); or

Provided written or oral objections at the hearing or an informal conference whose appeal is based upon any of the issues that were provided to the commissioner in the written objections or in testimony at the hearing or an informal conference on the application.

For permits for which the department gives public notice of a draft of a bond release, any applicant or aggrieved person may base an appeal on any material change to conditions in the final release from those in the draft, unless the material change has been subject to additional opportunity for public comment.

Any petition for appeal under this subsection (i) shall be filed with the commissioner within thirty (30) days after public notice of the commissioner's decision to grant or deny the release.

Notwithstanding § 4-5-223 or any other law to the contrary, this subsection (i) is the exclusive means for obtaining administrative review of the commissioner's issuance or denial of a bond release. When a petition to appeal the commissioner's issuance or denial of a bond release is timely filed, the procedure for conducting the contested case shall be in accordance with § 59-8-120.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-116. Complaints — Cease and desist orders. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

If the commissioner determines that any operator, permittee, or person is in violation of this part, the board's rules, or any permit condition required by this part, or order issued pursuant to this part, the commissioner shall issue a complaint to the operator, permittee, or person fixing a reasonable time, but not more than ninety (90) days, for the abatement of the violation. The board may promulgate rules under § 59-8-103(b)(1) that allow for reasonable extensions beyond ninety (90) days when it is not feasible to abate the violation within that time; however, when the abatement time permitted is in excess of ninety (90) days, interim abatement measures shall be imposed to the extent necessary to minimize harm to the public or the environment.

If, upon expiration of the period of time as originally fixed or subsequently extended, for good cause shown and upon the written finding of the commissioner, the commissioner finds that the violation has not been abated and that the operator, permittee, or person has not reached an agreement with the commissioner, the commissioner shall immediately order a cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations or the portion of the operations relevant to the violation.

A cease and desist order remains in effect until the commissioner determines that the violation has been abated, or until modified, vacated, or terminated by the commissioner under subsection (d).

In the cease and desist order issued under this subsection (a), the commissioner shall determine the steps necessary to abate the violation in the most expeditious manner possible and shall include the necessary measures in the cease and desist order.

If a cease and desist order is not complied with, or the operator, permittee, or person refuses or fails to correct the violation, the permit may be revoked and the performance bond shall then be forfeited to the commissioner. When a bond is forfeited, the commissioner shall give notice to the attorney general and reporter, who shall collect the forfeiture.

If the commissioner determines that any condition or practice exists, or that the operator, permittee, or person is in violation of this part, the board's rules, or any permit condition required by this part, or order issued pursuant to this part, which condition, practice, or violation also creates an imminent danger to the health and safety of the public, or is causing, or can reasonably be expected to cause significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, the commissioner shall immediately order a cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations or the portion of the operations relevant to the condition, practice, or violation. The cease and desist order remains in effect until the commissioner determines that the condition, practice, or violation has been abated, or until modified, vacated, or terminated by the commissioner under subsection (d). If the commissioner finds that the ordered cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations, or any portion of operations, shall not completely abate the imminent danger to the health and safety of the public or the significant, imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, then the commissioner shall, in addition to issuing a cease and desist order, impose affirmative obligations on the operator requiring the operator to take whatever steps the commissioner deems necessary to abate the imminent danger or the significant environmental harm.

The commissioner shall also issue an immediate cease and desist order to any operator mining without a valid permit or mining an area not covered by a valid permit.

The commissioner shall issue cease and desist orders, or suspend or revoke permits, for a pattern of violations caused by an unwarranted failure to comply with this part, the board's rules, or a permit or order, after issuing a show cause order and offering an opportunity for a public hearing of which all interested parties shall be notified. If the operator, permittee, or person fails to show cause as to why the permit should not be suspended or revoked, the commissioner shall suspend or revoke the permit. A written or electronic record shall be kept of any show cause hearing by the commissioner and the hearing shall be subject to title 4, chapter 5, part 3. Within sixty (60) days following a show cause hearing, the commissioner shall issue and furnish to the permittee and all other parties to the hearing a written decision, and the commissioner's findings, concerning suspension or revocation of the permit. Appeals of the commissioner's decision shall be pursuant to § 59-8-120.

If the permit is revoked, then mining shall immediately cease and reclamation shall be completed within a period specified by the commissioner, or the commissioner shall declare the performance bond for the operation to be forfeited. When a bond is forfeited, the commissioner shall give notice to the attorney general and reporter, who shall collect the forfeiture.

Complaints and cease and desist orders shall set forth with reasonable specificity:

The nature of the violation;

The remedial action required;

The period of time established for abatement; and

A reasonable description of the portion of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation to which the complaint or order applies.

The commissioner shall deliver each complaint or cease and desist order issued under this section by:

Personal service upon the operator, permittee, or person; or

Certified mail return receipt requested, when the complaint or cease and desist order is mailed to the operator, permittee, or person at the address shown in the permit application, to the agent for service of process for the operator, permittee, or person at the address shown in the permit application, to the surety's address as shown on the bond document filed with the permit, or, when no permit has been issued, to the last known address of the operator, permittee, or person.

All complaints and cease and desist orders shall be in writing and shall be signed by the commissioner.

The commissioner may modify, vacate, or terminate any complaint or cease and desist order issued pursuant to this section.

Any complaint or cease and desist order issued pursuant to this section, which requires cessation of active mining, expires within thirty (30) days of actual notice to the operator, permittee, or person, unless an informal public hearing is held at the site or within a reasonable proximity to the site where any viewings of the site can be conducted during the course of the informal public hearing; however, the complaint or cease and desist order shall not expire if the operator, permittee, or person waives the informal hearing.

The commissioner shall send a copy of all complaints and cease and desist orders to the permittee's surety.

Except as provided in subsection (c), a complaint or cease and desist order issued pursuant to this section shall inform the alleged violator or violators of the opportunity for an informal public hearing as provided in subdivision (d)(5), if applicable, and a hearing before the board as provided in § 59-8-120. If the complaint or cease and desist order is appealed within thirty (30) days of the date the complaint or cease and desist order is served, the operator, permittee, or person may request that the commissioner make a decision upon both the complaint or cease and desist order and a notice of proposed assessment arising from the complaint or cease and desist order as provided in § 59-8-117(b), if appropriate. Upon the request of the alleged violator or violators, the department shall promptly make available and provide access to any documents and other information that address the factual basis of the complaint.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-117. Civil penalty — Notice of proposed assessment — Hearing — Appeal —Recovery of assessment or violation — Violations — Correction of violation. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Any operator, permittee, or person who violates this part, the board's rules, or any permit condition required by this part, or order issued pursuant to this part may be assessed a civil penalty by the commissioner, except that if the violation leads to the issuance of a cease and desist order, a civil penalty shall be assessed. A civil penalty assessed under this subsection (a) shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Each day of continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation for purposes of assessing a civil penalty. In determining the amount of the penalty, the commissioner shall consider the history of previous violations by the operator, permittee, or person at the particular coal surface mining operation; the seriousness of the violation, including any irreparable harm to the environment and any danger to the health or safety of the public; whether the operator, permittee, or person was negligent; and the demonstrated good faith of the operator, permittee, or person charged in attempting to achieve rapid compliance after notification of the violation. If notice of a proposed assessment is not provided as part of a complaint or cease and desist order pursuant to § 59-8-116, then the commissioner shall give notice of a proposed assessment by certified mail return receipt requested as provided in § 59-8-116(d)(2) within thirty (30) days of the date the complaint or order is served. If an appeal from the notice of proposed assessment is not made to the commissioner or the board as provided in subsection (b) or (c) by the operator, permittee, or person within thirty (30) days of service of the notification of the proposed assessment, the operator, permittee, or person is deemed to have consented to the assessment, and the assessment shall become final.

Unless the operator, permittee, or person subject to the notice of proposed assessment consents to the notice of proposed assessment under subsection (a), the commissioner shall not assess a civil penalty until the operator, permittee, or person receives an opportunity for a hearing before the commissioner.

When a public hearing has been held, the commissioner shall make findings of fact, and the commissioner shall issue a written decision as to the occurrence of the violation, if submitted by the operator, permittee, or person as provided in § 59-8-116(f), and the amount of the penalty that is warranted, incorporating, when appropriate, an order requiring that the penalty be paid.

Any hearing under this subsection (b) shall be of record and shall be subject to title 4, chapter 5, part 3.

If an operator, permittee, or person who is charged with a violation fails to appear at the public hearing, then the operator, permittee, or person shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment, and the assessment shall become final.

The operator, permittee, or person shall have thirty (30) days after the notice of proposed assessment is served pursuant to subsection (a) or, after a decision is issued by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) if an appeal is filed pursuant to subsection (b), to pay the proposed penalty in full or, if the operator, permittee, or person wishes to contest either the amount of the penalty or the violation, forward the proposed amount to the commissioner for placement in an escrow account. If, through administrative or judicial review of the proposed violation or penalty, the board, chancellor, or judge determines that no violation occurred or that the amount of the penalty should be reduced, the commissioner shall, within thirty (30) days of the determination, remit the applicable escrowed amount to the operator, permittee, or person with interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum, or at the prevailing department of treasury rate, whichever is greater. Failure to forward the money to the commissioner within thirty (30) days shall result in a waiver of all legal rights to contest the violation or the amount of the penalty.

Notwithstanding § 20-4-101 to the contrary, the commissioner, through the attorney general and reporter, may institute proceedings in the name of the department for the recovery of any assessment or penalty made under this part in the chancery court for Davidson County, or the chancery court or circuit court in the district where the surface coal mining and reclamation operation is located. All sums recovered shall be placed in the state treasury and credited to the coal mining protection fund, created by § 59-8-132.

Any person, who willfully and knowingly violates a condition of a permit issued under this part or fails or refuses to comply with any complaint or order issued under § 59-8-116, § 59-8-120, or § 59-8-121, except an order incorporated under subsections (a) and (b), or who willfully and knowingly falsifies or fails to make any statement, representation, or certification in any records, information, plans, specifications, or other data required by the board or the commissioner, commits a Class E felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished only by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Any person who knowingly violates the conflict of interest provisions of § 59-8-127 commits a Class E felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished only by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). For purposes of this subsection (f), “person” includes state officials and employees.

Any person who knowingly engages in surface coal mining and reclamation operations without first obtaining a permit for the mine from the commissioner, commits a Class E felony, and upon conviction, shall be punished only by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Any person who, except as permitted by law, knowingly prevents or impedes an employee of this state from performing the employee's duty under this part commits a Class E felony, and upon conviction, shall be punished only by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Whenever a corporation commits the acts described in subsection (a), (e), (g), or (h), any director, officer, or agent of the corporation who willfully and knowingly authorized, ordered, or carried out the violation, failure, or refusal shall be subject to the same civil penalties and fines that may be imposed under subsections (a), (e), (g), and (h).

The time period for the correction of a violation for which a complaint has been issued under § 59-8-116 shall not end:

In the case of any review proceeding under § 59-8-120 that is initiated by the operator, permittee, or person wherein the commissioner orders, after an expedited hearing, the suspension of the abatement requirements of the complaint after determining that the operator, permittee, or person will suffer irreparable loss or damage from the application of those requirements, until the entry of a final order by the board; or

In the case of any review proceeding under § 59-8-121 that is initiated by the operator, permittee, or person wherein the court orders the suspension of the abatement requirements, until the entry of an order of the court.

Any operator, permittee, or person who fails to correct a violation for which a complaint has been issued under § 59-8-116 within the period permitted for its correction shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for each day during which the failure to correct or violation continues.

All penalties recovered under this section shall be placed in the state treasury and credited to the coal mining protection fund, created in § 59-8-132. Nothing in this part abrogates the right of any person who is materially or personally damaged or injured by the operation of a surface mine to seek remedies against the responsible person in court.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]